Rhode Island, session 2025, SB123.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-88 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-88. Tax amnesty.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter of the general laws to the contrary,
any municipality may, by ordinance, duly enacted, authorize two (2) separate sixty-day (60) periods
during fiscal years 2024 or 2025 one tax amnesty period every three (3) years, during which a
waiver of interest and penalties on overdue real estate payments, and tangible tax payments and
motor vehicles tax payments may be made if the request for a waiver of interest and penalties is in
writing, signed, and dated by the taxpayer and within the two (2) sixty-day (60) waiver periods by
July 1 of the year in which the municipality has scheduled the waiver of penalties and interest.
(b) Decisions of the tax assessor or collector shall be in writing and contain a notice to the
city or town council. If the taxpayer receives an adverse decision from the tax assessor or collector,
the taxpayer shall pay the interest and penalties and may file a claim for reimbursement with the
city or town council within ten (10) days of the decision.
(c) Any request for a waiver of taxes and penalties that meets criteria established by this
section, pursuant to a duly enacted ordinance, may be granted by the city or town.
(d) Waivers of interest and penalties shall not be granted for any taxes owed for the tax
year during which the amnesty periods are offered.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000877
========
LC000877 - Page 2 of 3